fr: Type de légende: Vide; Personnalisable imprimable; Indicateur de longueur; Code couleur pré-imprimé; Lettres pré-imprimées; Numéros pré-imprimés; Symboles pré-imprimés; Autre
tr: Lejant tipi: Boş; Özel yazdırılabilir; Uzunluk göstergesi; Önceden basılmış renk kodu; Önceden basılmış harfler; Önceden basılmış sayılar; Önceden basılmış semboller; Diğer
it: Tipo di legenda: Vuoto; Personalizzabile stampabile; Indicatore di lunghezza; Codice colore prestampato; Lettere prestampate; Numeri prestampati; Simboli prestampati; Altro
zh-TW: 標籤類型: 空白; 可自訂列印; 長度指示器; 預印色碼; 預印字母; 預印數字; 預印符號; 其他
zh-CN: 字符标记类型: 空白; 可定制打印; 长度指示器; 预印色码; 预印字母; 预印数字; 预印符号; 其他
el: Τύπος επιγραφής: Κενή; Προσαρμοσμένο εκτυπώσιμο; Δείκτης μήκους; Προεκτυπωμένος κωδικός χρώματος; Προεκτυπωμένα γράμματα; Προεκτυπωμένοι αριθμοί; Προεκτυπωμένα σύμβολα; Άλλο
en: Legend type: Blank; Custom printable; Length indicator; Pre-printed color code; Pre-printed letters; Pre-printed numbers; Pre-printed symbols; Other
sk-SK: Typ legendy: Prázdny; Vlastný tlačiteľný; Ukazovateľ dĺžky; Predtlačený farebný kód; Predtlačené písmená; Predtlačené čísla; Predtlačené symboly; Iné
cs: Typ popisku: Prázdný; Vlastní potisk; Indikátor délky; Předtištěný barevný kód; Předtištěná písmena; Předtištěná čísla; Předtištěné symboly; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip legendă: Gol; Personalizabil printabil; Indicator de lungime; Cod de culoare pre-tipărit; Litere pre-tipărite; Numere pre-tipărite; Simboluri pre-tipărite; Altele
vi: Loại chú giải: Trống rỗng; In tùy chỉnh được; Chỉ báo chiều dài; Mã màu in sẵn; Chữ cái in sẵn; Số in sẵn; Ký hiệu in sẵn; Khác
ja: レジェンドタイプ: 空白; カスタム印刷可能; 長さインジケーター; 事前印刷カラーコード; 事前印刷文字; 事前印刷数字; 事前印刷記号; その他
nl: Type legende: Blanco; Aangepast printbaar; Lengte-indicator; Voorgedrukte kleurcode; Voorgedrukte letters; Voorgedrukte nummers; Voorgedrukte symbolen; Andere
es: Tipo de leyenda: En blanco; Personalizable imprimible; Indicador de longitud; Código de color preimpreso; Letras preimpresas; Números preimpresos; Símbolos preimpresos; Otros
fi: Merkkauksen tyyppi: Tyhjä; Mukautettu tulostettava; Pituuden ilmaisin; Esipainettu värikoodi; Esipainetut kirjaimet; Esipainetut numerot; Esipainetut symbolit; Muu
hr-HR: Tip legende: Prazna; Prilagođeno za ispis; Pokazatelj duljine; Unaprijed otisnuti kod boja; Unaprijed otisnuta slova; Unaprijed otisnuti brojevi; Unaprijed otisnuti simboli; Ostalo
sl-SI: Tip legende: Prazna; Po meri za tisk; Indikator dolžine; Vnaprej natisnjena barvna koda; Vnaprej natisnjene črke; Vnaprej natisnjene številke; Vnaprej natisnjeni simboli; Drugo
de: Beschriftungstyp: Leer; Individuell bedruckbar; Längenindikator; Vorgedruckter Farbcode; Vorgedruckte Buchstaben; Vorgedruckte Zahlen; Vorgedruckte Symbole; Sonstiges
ru: Тип маркировки: Пустой; Для печати; Индикатор длины; Предварительно напечатанный цветовой код; Предварительно напечатанные буквы; Предварительно напечатанные цифры; Предварительно напечатанные символы; Другой
nb: Merkingstype: Tom; Egendefinerbar utskrift; Lengdeindikator; Forhåndstrykt fargekode; Forhåndstrykte bokstaver; Forhåndstrykte tall; Forhåndstrykte symboler; Annet
sv: Märkningstyp: Tom; Anpassad utskrivbar; Längdindikator; Förtryckt färgkod; Förtryckta bokstäver; Förtryckta nummer; Förtryckta symboler; Övrigt
hu: Jelölés típusa: Üres; Egyedi nyomtatható; Hosszjelző; Előre nyomtatott színkód; Előre nyomtatott betűk; Előre nyomtatott számok; Előre nyomtatott szimbólumok; Egyéb
da: Forklaringstype: Blank; Tilpasselig printbar; Længdeindikator; Fortrykt farvekode; Fortrykte bogstaver; Fortrykte tal; Fortrykte symboler; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de legenda: Em branco; Personalizável imprimível; Indicador de comprimento; Código de cores pré-impresso; Letras pré-impressas; Números pré-impressos; Símbolos pré-impressos; Outro
lt-LT: Ženklinimo tipas: Tuščias; Pritaikomas spausdinimui; Ilgio indikatorius; Iš anksto atspausdintas spalvų kodas; Iš anksto atspausdintos raidės; Iš anksto atspausdinti skaičiai; Iš anksto atspausdinti simboliai; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de legenda: Em branco; Personalizável imprimível; Indicador de comprimento; Código de cores pré-impresso; Letras pré-impressas; Números pré-impressos; Símbolos pré-impressos; Outro
bg-BG: Тип легенда: Празен; Персонализиран за печат; Индикатор за дължина; Предварително отпечатан цветови код; Предварително отпечатани букви; Предварително отпечатани числа; Предварително отпечатани символи; Други
th: ประเภทตำนาน: ว่างเปล่า; พิมพ์ได้ตามต้องการ; ตัวบ่งชี้ความยาว; รหัสสีพิมพ์ไว้ล่วงหน้า; ตัวอักษรพิมพ์ไว้ล่วงหน้า; ตัวเลขพิมพ์ไว้ล่วงหน้า; สัญลักษณ์พิมพ์ไว้ล่วงหน้า; อื่นๆ
ko: 범례 유형: 공백; 맞춤 인쇄 가능; 길이 표시기; 사전 인쇄 색상 코드; 사전 인쇄 문자; 사전 인쇄 숫자; 사전 인쇄 기호; 기타
pl: Typ legendy: Puste; Niestandardowy do druku; Wskaźnik długości; Wstępnie wydrukowany kod koloru; Wstępnie wydrukowane litery; Wstępnie wydrukowane liczby; Wstępnie wydrukowane symbole; Inne